Wisconsin, session 2025, AB701.
do enact as follows:AB701,11Section 1. 802.06 (2) (a) 11. of the statutes is created to read:AB701,2,22802.06 (2) (a) 11. That s. 802.065 applies.AB701,23Section 2. 802.06 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB701,3,24802.06 (2) (b) A motion making any of the defenses in par. (a) 1. to 10. shall be 5made before pleading if a further pleading is permitted. Objection to venue shall be 6made in accordance with s. 801.51. If a pleading sets forth a claim for relief to 7which the adverse party is not required to serve a responsive pleading, the adverse 8party may assert at the trial any defense in law or fact to that claim for relief. If on 9a motion asserting the defense described in par. (a) 6. to dismiss for failure of the 10pleading to state a claim upon which relief can be granted, or on a motion asserting 11the defenses described in par. (a) 8. or 9., matters outside of the pleadings are 12presented to and not excluded by the court, the motion shall be treated as one for 13summary judgment and disposed of as provided in s. 802.08, and all parties shall be 14given reasonable opportunity to present all material made pertinent to such a 1motion by s. 802.08. A motion making the defense in par. (a) 11. shall be made as 2provided in s. 802.065 (3).AB701,33Section 3. 802.065 of the statutes is created to read:AB701,3,44802.065 Uniform Public Expression Protection Law. AB701,3,65(1) Short title. This section may be cited as the Uniform Public Expression 6Protection Law.AB701,3,77(2) Scope. (a) In this subsection:AB701,3,1081. “Goods or services” does not include the creation, dissemination, exhibition, 9or advertisement or similar promotion of a dramatic, literary, musical, political, 10journalistic, or artistic work.AB701,3,12112. “Governmental unit” means a public corporation or government or 12governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.AB701,3,14133. “Person” means an individual, estate, trust, partnership, business or 14nonprofit entity, governmental unit, or other legal entity.AB701,3,1615(b) Except as otherwise provided in par. (c), this section applies to a cause of 16action asserted in a civil action against a person based on any of the following:AB701,3,18171. The person’s communication in a legislative, executive, judicial, 18administrative, or other governmental proceeding.AB701,3,20192. The person’s communication on an issue under consideration or review in a 20legislative, executive, judicial, administrative, or other governmental proceeding.AB701,3,23213. The person’s exercise of the right of freedom of speech or of the press, the 22right to assemble or petition, or the right of association, guaranteed by the U.S. 23Constitution or the constitution of this state, on a matter of public concern.AB701,3,2424(c) This section does not apply to any of the following:AB701,4,211. A cause of action asserted against a governmental unit or an employee or 2agent of a governmental unit acting or purporting to act in an official capacity.AB701,4,532. A cause of action asserted by a governmental unit or an employee or agent 4of a governmental unit acting in an official capacity to enforce a law to protect 5against an imminent threat to public health or safety.AB701,4,863. A cause of action asserted against a person primarily engaged in the 7business of selling or leasing goods or services if the cause of action arises out of a 8communication related to the person’s sale or lease of the goods or services.AB701,4,139(3) Special motion for expedited relief. Not later than 60 days after a 10party is served with a complaint, cross claim, counterclaim, 3rd-party complaint, or 11other pleading that asserts a cause of action to which this section applies, or at a 12later time on a showing of good cause, the party may file a special motion for 13expedited relief to dismiss the cause of action or part of the cause of action.AB701,4,1514(4) Stay. (a) Except as otherwise provided in pars. (d) to (g), on the filing of 15a motion under sub. (3), all of the following apply:AB701,4,17161. All other proceedings between the moving party and responding party, 17including discovery and a pending hearing or motion, are stayed.AB701,4,21182. On motion by the moving party, the court may stay a hearing or motion 19involving another party, or discovery by another party, if the hearing or ruling on 20the motion would adjudicate, or the discovery would relate to, an issue material to 21the motion under sub. (3).AB701,4,2422(b) A stay under par. (a) remains in effect until entry of an order ruling on the 23motion under sub. (3) and expiration of the time under sub. (9) for the moving party 24to appeal the order.AB701,5,41(c) Except as otherwise provided in pars. (e), (f), and (g), if a party appeals 2from an order ruling on a motion under sub. (3), all proceedings between all parties 3in the action are stayed. The stay remains in effect until the conclusion of the 4appeal.AB701,5,85(d) During a stay under par. (a), the court may allow limited discovery if a 6party shows that specific information is necessary to establish whether a party has 7satisfied or failed to satisfy a burden under sub. (7) (a) and the information is not 8reasonably available unless discovery is allowed.AB701,5,109(e) A motion under sub. (10) for costs, attorney fees, and expenses is not 10subject to a stay under this subsection.AB701,5,1311(f) A stay under this subsection does not affect a party’s ability to voluntarily 12dismiss a cause of action or part of a cause of action or move to sever a cause of 13action.AB701,5,1514(g) During a stay under this subsection, the court for good cause may hear and 15rule on any of the following:AB701,5,16161. A motion unrelated to the motion under sub. (3).AB701,5,18172. A motion seeking a special or preliminary injunction to protect against an 18imminent threat to public health or safety.AB701,5,2119(5) Hearing. (a) The court shall hear a motion under sub. (3) not later than 2060 days after filing of the motion, unless the court orders a later hearing to allow 21limited discovery under sub. (4) (d) or for other good cause.AB701,6,222(b) If the court orders a later hearing under par. (a) to allow limited discovery, 23the court shall hear the motion under sub. (3) not later than 60 days after the court 1order allowing the discovery, unless the court orders a later hearing under par. (a) 2for other good cause.AB701,6,53(6) Proof. In ruling on a motion under sub. (3), the court shall consider the 4pleadings, the motion, any reply or response to the motion, and any evidence that 5could be considered in ruling on a motion for summary judgment under s. 802.08.AB701,6,86(7) Dismissal of cause of action in whole or part. (a) In ruling on a 7motion under sub. (3), the court shall dismiss with prejudice a cause of action, or 8part of a cause of action, if all of the following apply:AB701,6,991. The moving party establishes under sub. (2) (b) that this section applies.AB701,6,11102. The responding party fails to establish under sub. (2) (c) that this section 11does not apply.AB701,6,14123. Either the responding party fails to establish a prima facie case as to each 13essential element of the cause of action or the moving party establishes any of the 14following:AB701,6,1615a. That the responding party failed to state a cause of action upon which relief 16can be granted.AB701,6,1917b. That there is no genuine issue as to any material fact and the moving party 18is entitled to judgment as a matter of law on the cause of action or part of the cause 19of action.AB701,6,2320(b) A voluntary dismissal without prejudice of a responding party’s cause of 21action, or part of a cause of action, that is the subject of a motion under sub. (3) does 22not affect a moving party’s right to obtain a ruling on the motion and seek costs, 23attorney fees, and expenses under sub. (10). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab701 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab701 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB701 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB701 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB701: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting